third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#áarfiskur
SFX 418 N 8
SFX 418 0 fisk .
SFX 418 0 fiski .
SFX 418 0 fiskin .
SFX 418 0 fiskinum .
SFX 418 0 fisks .
SFX 418 0 fisksins .
SFX 418 0 fiskur .
SFX 418 0 fiskurin .

#abbabeiggi
SFX 419 N 12
SFX 419 j i .
SFX 419 j in .
SFX 419 0 a .
SFX 419 0 an .
SFX 419 0 anna .
SFX 419 0 ans .
SFX 419 0 anum .
SFX 419 0 ar .
SFX 419 0 arnar .
SFX 419 0 arnir .
SFX 419 0 um .
SFX 419 0 unum .

#arbeiðsevni
SFX 420 N 7
SFX 420 0 a .
SFX 420 0 anna .
SFX 420 0 i .
SFX 420 0 ini .
SFX 420 0 ir .
SFX 420 0 um .
SFX 420 0 unum .

#aksaskjótast
SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 st .

#eftirleggin
SFX 422 N 8
SFX 422 g na .
SFX 422 g nan .
SFX 422 g nar .
SFX 422 g nari .
SFX 422 g nir .
SFX 422 g num .
SFX 422 0 ið .
SFX 422 0 in .

#afturfall
SFX 423 N 6
SFX 423 0 fall .
SFX 423 0 falli .
SFX 423 0 fallið .
SFX 423 0 fallinum .
SFX 423 0 fals .
SFX 423 0 falsins .

#almennur
SFX 424 N 8
SFX 424 n t .
SFX 424 0 a .
SFX 424 0 an .
SFX 424 0 ar .
SFX 424 0 ari .
SFX 424 0 ir .
SFX 424 0 um .
SFX 424 0 ur .

#bakkahagi
SFX 425 N 12
SFX 425 0 haga .
SFX 425 0 hagan .
SFX 425 0 haganna .
SFX 425 0 hagans .
SFX 425 0 haganum .
SFX 425 0 hagar .
SFX 425 0 hagarnar .
SFX 425 0 hagarnir .
SFX 425 0 hagi .
SFX 425 0 hagin .
SFX 425 0 høgum .
SFX 425 0 høgunum .

#avdráttarfríur
SFX 426 N 9
SFX 426 0 frí .
SFX 426 0 fría .
SFX 426 0 frían .
SFX 426 0 fríar .
SFX 426 0 fríari .
SFX 426 0 fríir .
SFX 426 0 frítt .
SFX 426 0 fríum .
SFX 426 0 fríur .

#beinasúpan
SFX 427 N 6
SFX 427 0 súpan .
SFX 427 0 súpanar .
SFX 427 0 súpanarinnar .
SFX 427 0 súpanin .
SFX 427 0 súpanina .
SFX 427 0 súpanini .

#avlagdur
SFX 428 N 9
SFX 428 0 lagda .
SFX 428 0 lagdan .
SFX 428 0 lagdar .
SFX 428 0 lagdari .
SFX 428 0 lagdir .
SFX 428 0 lagdur .
SFX 428 0 lagt .
SFX 428 0 løgd .
SFX 428 0 løgdum .

#abbabróðir
SFX 429 N 14
SFX 429 0 bróðir .
SFX 429 0 bróðirin .
SFX 429 0 brøðra .
SFX 429 0 brøðranna .
SFX 429 0 bróðrinum .
SFX 429 0 brøðrum .
SFX 429 0 brøðrunum .
SFX 429 0 bróður .
SFX 429 0 brøður .
SFX 429 0 bróðurin .
SFX 429 0 bróðurinum .
SFX 429 0 brøðurnar .
SFX 429 0 brøðurnir .
SFX 429 0 bróðursins .

#apublóma
SFX 430 N 11
SFX 430 0 blóma .
SFX 430 0 blóman .
SFX 430 0 blómanna .
SFX 430 0 blómu .
SFX 430 0 blómum .
SFX 430 0 blómuna .
SFX 430 0 blómuni .
SFX 430 0 blómunnar .
SFX 430 0 blómunum .
SFX 430 0 blómur .
SFX 430 0 blómurnar .

#ársgildi
SFX 431 N 11
SFX 431 0 gilda .
SFX 431 0 gildanna .
SFX 431 0 gildi .
SFX 431 0 gildið .
SFX 431 0 gildini .
SFX 431 0 gildinum .
SFX 431 0 gildir .
SFX 431 0 gildis .
SFX 431 0 gildisins .
SFX 431 0 gildum .
SFX 431 0 gildunum .

#barnaverndartænasta
SFX 432 N 11
SFX 432 0 tænasta .
SFX 432 0 tænastan .
SFX 432 0 tænastanna .
SFX 432 0 tænastu .
SFX 432 0 tænastum .
SFX 432 0 tænastuna .
SFX 432 0 tænastuni .
SFX 432 0 tænastunnar .
SFX 432 0 tænastunum .
SFX 432 0 tænastur .
SFX 432 0 tænasturnar .

#bláleittur
SFX 433 N 8
SFX 433 0 leitt .
SFX 433 0 leitta .
SFX 433 0 leittan .
SFX 433 0 leittar .
SFX 433 0 leittari .
SFX 433 0 leittir .
SFX 433 0 leittum .
SFX 433 0 leittur .

#brestbúgvin
SFX 434 N 8
SFX 434 0 búgvið .
SFX 434 0 búgvin .
SFX 434 0 búna .
SFX 434 0 búnan .
SFX 434 0 búnar .
SFX 434 0 búnari .
SFX 434 0 búnir .
SFX 434 0 búnum .

#bakbrestur
SFX 435 N 15
SFX 435 0 brest .
SFX 435 0 bresta .
SFX 435 0 brestanna .
SFX 435 0 bresti .
SFX 435 0 brestin .
SFX 435 0 brestinum .
SFX 435 0 brestir .
SFX 435 0 brestirnar .
SFX 435 0 brestirnir .
SFX 435 0 brests .
SFX 435 0 brestsins .
SFX 435 0 brestum .
SFX 435 0 brestunum .
SFX 435 0 brestur .
SFX 435 0 bresturin .

#andatrúgv
SFX 436 N 4
SFX 436 0 ar .
SFX 436 0 arinnar .
SFX 436 0 nna .
SFX 436 0 nni .

#avlamisbilur
SFX 437 N 15
SFX 437 0 bil .
SFX 437 0 bila .
SFX 437 0 bilanna .
SFX 437 0 bilar .
SFX 437 0 bilarnar .
SFX 437 0 bilarnir .
SFX 437 0 bili .
SFX 437 0 bilin .
SFX 437 0 bilinum .
SFX 437 0 bils .
SFX 437 0 bilsins .
SFX 437 0 bilum .
SFX 437 0 bilunum .
SFX 437 0 bilur .
SFX 437 0 bilurin .

#aðaltáttur
SFX 438 N 11
SFX 438 0 a .
SFX 438 0 anna .
SFX 438 0 ar .
SFX 438 0 arins .
SFX 438 0 i .
SFX 438 0 in .
SFX 438 0 inum .
SFX 438 0 um .
SFX 438 0 unum .
SFX 438 0 ur .
SFX 438 0 urin .

#arbeiðararørsla
SFX 439 N 11
SFX 439 0 rørsla .
SFX 439 0 rørslan .
SFX 439 0 rørslanna .
SFX 439 0 rørslu .
SFX 439 0 rørslum .
SFX 439 0 rørsluna .
SFX 439 0 rørsluni .
SFX 439 0 rørslunnar .
SFX 439 0 rørslunum .
SFX 439 0 rørslur .
SFX 439 0 rørslurnar .

#andlitslitur
SFX 440 N 15
SFX 440 0 lit .
SFX 440 0 lita .
SFX 440 0 litanna .
SFX 440 0 litar .
SFX 440 0 litarins .
SFX 440 0 liti .
SFX 440 0 litin .
SFX 440 0 litinum .
SFX 440 0 litir .
SFX 440 0 litirnar .
SFX 440 0 litirnir .
SFX 440 0 litum .
SFX 440 0 litunum .
SFX 440 0 litur .
SFX 440 0 liturin .

#beringarbyrði
SFX 441 N 11
SFX 441 0 a .
SFX 441 0 anna .
SFX 441 0 ar .
SFX 441 0 arinnar .
SFX 441 0 arnar .
SFX 441 0 i .
SFX 441 0 in .
SFX 441 0 ina .
SFX 441 0 ini .
SFX 441 0 um .
SFX 441 0 unum .

#búkhald
SFX 442 N 6
SFX 442 0 hald .
SFX 442 0 haldi .
SFX 442 0 haldið .
SFX 442 0 haldinum .
SFX 442 0 halds .
SFX 442 0 haldsins .

#aðalsfrúgv
SFX 443 N 8
SFX 443 0 a .
SFX 443 0 anna .
SFX 443 0 ar .
SFX 443 0 arinnar .
SFX 443 0 arnar .
SFX 443 0 in .
SFX 443 0 um .
SFX 443 0 unum .

#aliknappur
SFX 444 N 17
SFX 444 0 knapp .
SFX 444 0 knappa .
SFX 444 0 knappanna .
SFX 444 0 knappar .
SFX 444 0 knapparnar .
SFX 444 0 knapparnir .
SFX 444 0 knappi .
SFX 444 0 knappin .
SFX 444 0 knappinum .
SFX 444 0 knappum .
SFX 444 0 knappunum .
SFX 444 0 knappur .
SFX 444 0 knappurin .
SFX 444 0 knaps .
SFX 444 0 knapsins .
SFX 444 0 knøppum .
SFX 444 0 knøppunum .

#berghola
SFX 445 N 11
SFX 445 0 hola .
SFX 445 0 holan .
SFX 445 0 holanna .
SFX 445 0 holu .
SFX 445 0 holum .
SFX 445 0 holuna .
SFX 445 0 holuni .
SFX 445 0 holunnar .
SFX 445 0 holunum .
SFX 445 0 holur .
SFX 445 0 holurnar .

#angaurt
SFX 446 N 12
SFX 446 0 urt .
SFX 446 0 urta .
SFX 446 0 urtanna .
SFX 446 0 urtar .
SFX 446 0 urtarinnar .
SFX 446 0 urtin .
SFX 446 0 urtina .
SFX 446 0 urtini .
SFX 446 0 urtir .
SFX 446 0 urtirnar .
SFX 446 0 urtum .
SFX 446 0 urtunum .

#barnatonn
SFX 447 N 12
SFX 447 0 tanna .
SFX 447 0 tannanna .
SFX 447 0 tannar .
SFX 447 0 tannarinnar .
SFX 447 0 tenn .
SFX 447 0 tenninar .
SFX 447 0 tonn .
SFX 447 0 tonnin .
SFX 447 0 tonnina .
SFX 447 0 tonnini .
SFX 447 0 tonnum .
SFX 447 0 tonnunum .

#áarbotnur
SFX 448 N 15
SFX 448 0 botn .
SFX 448 0 botna .
SFX 448 0 botnanna .
SFX 448 0 botnar .
SFX 448 0 botnarnar .
SFX 448 0 botnarnir .
SFX 448 0 botni .
SFX 448 0 botnin .
SFX 448 0 botninum .
SFX 448 0 botns .
SFX 448 0 botnsins .
SFX 448 0 botnum .
SFX 448 0 botnunum .
SFX 448 0 botnur .
SFX 448 0 botnurin .

#avafturrunnin
SFX 449 N 8
SFX 449 n na .
SFX 449 n nan .
SFX 449 n nar .
SFX 449 n nari .
SFX 449 n nir .
SFX 449 n num .
SFX 449 0 ið .
SFX 449 0 in .

#aðalmið
SFX 450 N 12
SFX 450 0 mið .
SFX 450 0 miða .
SFX 450 0 miðanna .
SFX 450 0 miði .
SFX 450 0 miðið .
SFX 450 0 miðini .
SFX 450 0 miðinum .
SFX 450 0 miðnum .
SFX 450 0 miðs .
SFX 450 0 miðsins .
SFX 450 0 miðum .
SFX 450 0 miðunum .

#algilda
SFX 451 N 6
SFX 451 d t .
SFX 451 0 a .
SFX 451 0 i .
SFX 451 0 ir .
SFX 451 0 u .
SFX 451 0 ur .

#altarbreyð
SFX 452 N 12
SFX 452 0 breyð .
SFX 452 0 breyða .
SFX 452 0 breyðanna .
SFX 452 0 breyði .
SFX 452 0 breyðið .
SFX 452 0 breyðini .
SFX 452 0 breyðinum .
SFX 452 0 breyðnum .
SFX 452 0 breyðs .
SFX 452 0 breyðsins .
SFX 452 0 breyðum .
SFX 452 0 breyðunum .

#aðalstjórn
SFX 453 N 12
SFX 453 0 stjórn .
SFX 453 0 stjórna .
SFX 453 0 stjórnanna .
SFX 453 0 stjórnar .
SFX 453 0 stjórnarinnar .
SFX 453 0 stjórnin .
SFX 453 0 stjórnina .
SFX 453 0 stjórnini .
SFX 453 0 stjórnir .
SFX 453 0 stjórnirnar .
SFX 453 0 stjórnum .
SFX 453 0 stjórnunum .

#aðalverkfall
SFX 454 N 12
SFX 454 0 fall .
SFX 454 0 falla .
SFX 454 0 fallanna .
SFX 454 0 falli .
SFX 454 0 fallið .
SFX 454 0 fallinum .
SFX 454 0 fals .
SFX 454 0 falsins .
SFX 454 0 føll .
SFX 454 0 føllini .
SFX 454 0 føllum .
SFX 454 0 føllunum .
