third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
avhalds/1,439,431,20
barnaverndar/1,106,432,111
blóðkroppa/1,423
boð/42,6,168,284,105,4,37,20,102,240,142,370,386,72,432
borðfrúgv/443
Borðoy/436
brand/6,437,159,150,293,7,20,142,340,432
breis/1,421
bumbu/1,45,435,123
bygg/1,452,23,318,427
dals/1,448
díki/1,430
dimm/76,276,25,26,11,433,12,148,333,263,159,537
doys/1,433
eingjardún/1,446
epla/1,77,384,144,50,360,310,178,394,167,391,308,216,189,188,427,70,125,100,363
eyga/1,331,113,141,230,447
eyst/1,423,58,12,20,73,73
fákunn/19,64,138,158,424
fallskíggj/1,419
fáralót/1,420,119
farg/30,6,6,418,11
ferða/1,93,437,434,92,51,143,171,279,180,31,185,202,270,320,328,20,178,49,356,323,385,95,364,146,369,100,182,237,45,373,375
flammu/1,430
flóð/8,98,423,426,81
flutningshátt/438,33
fostur/1,151,429,185,371,97,125
framsend/1,451
framsígg/1,422
friðar/1,282,128,51,206,12,20,439,95,132,237,111,123,295
frukt/8,6,77,440,103
fuglabyrð/1,441
Fugloy/436
fullkorns/1,452
gil/1,331,448
gler/13,6,11,428,258,186
grápílur/443
grundsjónar/1,450
hálvbeiggj/1,419
hamskeyt/1,421
hár/10,6,62,284,423,81,198,36,440,49,394,223,258,97,22,104,125
haru/1,38,431,425,20,70,242,101
heilrunn/1,449
heingibrúgv/443
hermanna/1,453,455,274
hjá/1,214,445,50,86,428,185,269,235,20,450,228,102,223,131,345,182
høgguspón/438
hóreigg/1,422
horn/10,62,92,81,37,112,444,223,176,311,85,22,182
hoybyrð/1,3,441
húðar/1,36,440,216,288
huldu/1,151,93,455,271,51,365,286,112,86,12,440,20,450,228,131,146,377
hvirlu/1,435
hvør/1,454
í/1,205,179,455,296,206,265,378,442,322,31,428,137,114,159,186,379,157,313,165
ídnaðar/1,418,214,185,12,20,95,160,51,275,106,334,89,459
ímyndingarevn/1,420
ís/1,6,170,205,418,426,50,23,428,172,523,49,132,125,160
jøkils/1,425
jólaguds/1,432
kjarnorku/1,426,90,142
knetti/1,427
konu/1,93,124,429,51,431,180,36,20,132
kopphygg/1,422
kunn/6,75,138,58,60,158,424,265
kyns/1,434,36,269,12,257,380,216
lág/547,77,205,425,4,58,172,12,280,373,104,101
lambs/1,415,105,250,268,368,447
lend/451,15,11,21
litfer/1,421
livihátt/438,33
lívsevn/1,420
loftbrúgv/443
lóg/8,262,96,124,179,431,442,12,79,72
lyngheið/1,441
meistara/1,126,192,12,404,240,188,446,90,325
millum/1,92,81,75,378,319,261,269,440,20,350,228,176,150,188,142,90,101
minn/1,568,15,449,11
mógv/6,266,425,244
mold/17,6,331,179,81,445,339,136,22
motorlíggj/1,419
músa/1,429,426,144,445,318,365
myndugleikatrú/1,436
myrk/11,264,433,12,263,73,14
nám/3,6,117,450,209,14
nátt/110,6,174,143,50,180,428,219,333,308,186,324,272
niður/1,124,179,126,423,123,456,378,259,322,31,428,523,195,229,230,258,186,324,379,265
óstinn/424
óveðurs/1,331,435,38,143,12,387
perlu/1,62,430
persón/437,206,117,36,12,410,7,265
reis/421,3,3,11
reyvar/1,454,276,214,144,181,4,148,316,157,272
ring/900,44,123,259,11,202,439,72,7,14,182
røð/18,233,420,32,22
rosinu/1,452
royk/253,426,83,376,445,50,290,23,268,36,148,49,316,173,89,27,22
sáð/8,87,3,77,75,444,318,172,20,70,190,22
samgongu/1,77,282,197,107,153,20,45,453,51,334
selaveið/1,441
silvur/13,434,92,276,181,444,428,137,394,186,364,148
skalla/1,113,448,124,276,181,148,159,272
skelja/1,128,418,245,178,95
skíggj/1,419
skins/1,440,297
skóta/1,192,439,323
slíðra/1,62,294,361,230,447,103
smør/13,206,445,310,157
stabba/1,245,114,85,427
stav/6,124,81,411,11,444,31,258,184,147,90
stein/6,124,133,426,276,319,114,413,226,258,317,379,189,364,293,89,382,7,446,186
støðu/1,156,215,418,143,105,81,431,171,399,31,36,219,79,114,167,295,97,125,100
stórhøgg/1,422
talbend/1,451
tamar/1,442,79
tanga/1,437,95,142,93,81
tára/1,113,454,36,298
teljingarhátt/438,33
torvunn/1,449
trøllatrú/1,436
trygdargrunn/424
tunn/3,4,665,264,433,12,424,104
túvu/1,430,217,104
tví/1,6,205,254,179,291,353,206,431,50,428,58,261,269,148,235,302,280,176,187,193,379,345,386,165,166,447,369,97
tvíbura/1,151,429,137
uttanríkis/1,334,161,106,432
væl/8,10,19,205,434,296,75,265,259,486,322,235,280,186,104
vanga/1,113,435,276,114,272
vatn/30,6,331,415,174,448,271,133,418,81,456,171,389,425,50,23,360,300,172,36,440,219,195,340,137,49,366,226,131,317,289,293,337,345,446,22,90,363,384,295
viðskera/1,452,455,105
vinstra/1,197,453
